Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 16. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 38.05.800.
Reconstitution and administration of mental health land trust. [Repealed, § 39 ch 5 FSSLA 1994.]

Sec. 38.05.801.
Management of mental health trust land.

Mental health trust land shall be managed consistent with the trust principles imposed on the state by the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act, P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709 (1956).

Subject to (a) of this section, the department

shall manage mental health trust land under those provisions of law applicable to other state land;

may exchange other state land for mental health trust land under the procedures set out in AS 38.50; and

may correct errors or omissions in the legal descriptions of mental health trust land.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this section. The regulations adopted under this subsection must, at a minimum, address

maintenance of the trust land base;

management for the benefit of the trust;

management for long-term sustained yield of products from the land; and

management for multiple use of trust land.

History.

(§ 17 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose of the Act that enacted this section, see § 1, ch. 48, SLA 1987 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for text of the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act, see Volume 1.

For provisions authorizing an exchange with the federal government of certain Mental Health Trust land for certain United States Forest Service land if the chair of the board of trustees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority certifies that the conditions in sec. 6(a), ch. 22, SLA 2017, have been satisfied. The certification was made on January 4, 2019, and Chapter 22, SLA 2017, and the grant of the authority to complete the exchange took effect January 5, 2019.

Administrative Code. —

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For management of Alaska mental health trust land, see 11 AAC 99.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Lands belonging to the Alaska Railroad Corporation are not within “legislative designations” as that term is used in this section, regarding reconstitution and administration of mental health land trust, and accordingly may not be designated by the commissioner of natural resources as replacement mental health trust lands.
November 17, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.810.
Public and charitable use.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

38.05.183(h)

, the (1) lease, sale, or other disposal of state land or resources may be made to a state or federal agency or political subdivision, (2) lease, sale, or disposal of coal deposits suitable for mining may be made to a utility owned and operated by a government agency or nonprofit cooperative association organized to participate under the Federal Rural Electrification Act for the purpose of generating electric power and energy or the production of process steam, or both, (3) sale or other disposal of state land may be made to a tax-exempt, nonprofit corporation, association, club, or society organized and operated for the management of a cemetery or a solid waste or other public facility, or (4) sale or other disposal of land within a state subdivision may be made to that subdivision’s nonprofit, tax-exempt homeowners’ association, for less than the appraised value as determined by the director and approved by the commissioner to be fair and proper and in the best interests of the public, with due consideration given to the nature of the public services or function rendered by the applicant, and of the terms of the grant under which the land was acquired by the state. The commissioner shall ensure, by regulation, deed restriction, covenant, or otherwise, that disposals of land under this subsection serve a public purpose and are in the public interest.

Notwithstanding AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.080

and

38.05.095

, the director, upon application filed by an applicant eligible under (b) — (d) of this section, may, by negotiation and without competitive bid in the manner prescribed in (b) — (d) of this section, lease state land for a term of not more than 55 years. Before leasing, the director shall prepare a land use plan and a land classification to ensure that the proposed use is compatible with area utilization. Before the land may be leased under (b) — (d) of this section, it must be shown to the satisfaction of the director that the land is to be used for an established or definitely proposed project, and that the eligible applicant has the financial ability to carry out the project. The commissioner may establish limitations on the acreage that may be leased under (b) — (d) of this section to an applicant.

Eligible applicants under (b) — (d) of this section are limited to nonprofit corporations, associations, clubs, or societies organized and operated exclusively for charitable, religious, scientific, or educational purposes, or for the promotion of social welfare, if the project for which the land is desired conforms to those objectives and not commercial development. No lease of land may be granted under this section for a project closed to the use and enjoyment of the general public. In every case the applicant shall submit evidence that it is exempt from payment of federal income tax. As a condition of and in consideration of the rights acquired under a lease granted under (b) — (d) of this section, each eligible organization and its parent or subsidiary organizations shall (1) maintain and preserve books, accounts, and records that the director prescribes by regulation as necessary and appropriate; and (2) accord at all reasonable times to the state and its authorized agents and auditors the right of access to those books, accounts and records for the purpose of inspecting, examining and copying them. Any information provided the state in the course of an audit becomes a matter of public record.

The director may lease the land to an eligible applicant at a reasonable annual rental, taking into consideration the purposes for which the land is to be used and the financial resources of the applicant. The rental may not be less than one percent of the fair market value on land acquired primarily for development, or less than five percent of the fair market value on acquired land. Rent may not be charged for state land leased for a youth encampment. For the purposes of this subsection, “youth encampment” shall be defined by the commissioner by regulation. Renewal leases may be issued at the discretion of the director upon the expiration of a primary or renewal term. Each lease shall contain a provision for its termination as to all or part of the land upon a finding by the director that the land or a part of it has not been used by the lessee for the purpose specified in the lease for a period of two years. No lease may be assigned or subleased except with the consent of the director, and in any case may only be transferred to an applicant eligible under (b) — (d) of this section. A lessee may not change the use specified in the lease to another or additional use except with the consent of the director. If, at any time after the land is leased, the lessee attempts to assign the lease or transfer control over the land to another, or if the land is devoted to a use other than that for which the land was leased without the consent of the director, the lease automatically terminates.

The lease, sale, or other disposal of state land at appraised fair market value may be negotiated with a licensed public utility or a licensed common carrier by the director with the approval of the commissioner if the utility or carrier reasonably requires the land for the conduct of its business under its license. Notwithstanding AS

38.05.550

—

38.05.565

, the sale of materials necessary for construction, use, or maintenance of property leased, sold, or disposed of under this section may be negotiated by the director. A lease with a licensed public utility that is an electric utility entered into under this subsection may not include, as part of the rent or other fee that is negotiated or charged, an amount that is based on or determined by a percentage of gross revenue for renewable energy produced by the electric utility.

The commissioner shall lease state land for telephone or electric transmission and distribution lines for less than the appraised value of the land if the lessee is a nonprofit cooperative association organized under AS 10.25. The commissioner may lease state land that is not located within the boundary of a municipality for the disposal of garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material for less than the appraised value of the land if the lessee is a licensed public utility authorized to collect and dispose of garbage, refuse, trash, or other waste material outside the boundaries of a municipality. Before determining the annual rental, the commissioner shall consider the nature of the public service rendered by the nonprofit cooperative association or licensed public utility and the terms of the grant under which the land was acquired by the state. A nonprofit cooperative association may not construct improvements other than transmission or distribution lines and substations on land leased under this subsection. A licensed public utility may not construct permanent improvements on land leased under this subsection that are not related to the purpose of the lease.

The commissioner shall retain a reversionary interest on each sale or other disposal granted under (a) or (e) of this section. The commissioner may waive the reversionary interest on a written determination that the waiver is in the public interest.

The commissioner may issue permits to the Alaska Aerospace Corporation for purposes of down range space vehicle or payload overflight, booster retrieval, and recovery. The commissioner may, if it is in the best interests of the state, lease land to the Alaska Aerospace Corporation for other space-related purposes for, or at less than the appraised market value.

Subject to AS

38.05.820

, the commissioner may lease undeveloped state land, including tideland, to a port authority established under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

, if the state land is within the physical boundaries of the authority and is needed by the authority for purposes provided in AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

. The commissioner may lease developed state land, including tideland, to a port authority established under AS 29.35.600 — 29.35.730 only if, (1) the developed state land is within the physical boundaries of the authority; (2) the developed state land is needed by the authority for purposes provided in AS 29.35.600 — 29.35.730; and (3) the legislature approves the lease. A lease of state land under this subsection may be for less than the appraised market value.

History.

(§ 4 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 155 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 137 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 257 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1980; am §§ 34, 35 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1984; am § 42 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 55 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 75 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1991; am § 9 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 97 SLA 1992; am § 24 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 11 ch 22 SLA 2001; am § 12 ch 83 SLA 2010; am §§ 19, 20 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.315

. Renumbered in 1984.

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Cross references. —

For reservation to which contracts for sale, lease or grant of state land and deeds to state land, properties or interest to state land are subject, see AS

38.05.125

. For the Rural Electrification Act referred to in (a) of this section, see 7 U.S.C. 901 et seq.

Administrative Code. —

For short title and definitions, see 11 AAC 58, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is unclear whether quitclaims to the federal government by the division of natural resources to correct initial erroneous conveyances by the federal government to the state for purposes of the Mental Health Enabling Act fall within the scope of this section. August 4, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen.

Providing state land for a long-term, exclusive lease, at no cost, to a “youth encampment” (exempt from rental fees pursuant to subsection (d)), where the express purpose is to lead youthful campers to Christ, would result in the undeniable effect of placing the power, prestige and property of the state behind the advancement of one particular religious belief in violation of the Establishment Clauses of the state and federal constitutions.
September 2, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen.

The state could not directly sell a parcel of property to a historical society for use as a cemetery without public auction or indirectly to the society through a third party pursuant to AS

38.05.035(b)(5)

.
However, the parcel could be leased to the society for a term not to exceed 55 years, renewable indefinitely at 55 year intervals at the discretion of the director of the division of lands.
August 6, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

There would be no constitutional problem with a transfer of state land to a Methodist camp which is a nonprofit corporation organized for charitable purposes with nothing in its articles of incorporation indicating that its objective is to further the religious beliefs or dogmas of the Methodist Church, and where the lease or sale of the land to the camp would provide for the continued operation of a camp which, in the past, had served a broad cross-section of the public, and thus would accomplish a valid public purpose.
February 21, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

There is no legal authority for the department to convey fee title to tidelands to a unified home rule municipality under subsection (a), but as long as the use to which the municipality intends to put the tidelands is a permissible use, it would be consistent with the public trust for the department to lease the tidelands to a unified home rule municipality for less than fair market value under this section.
April 15, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.; December 2, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.820.
Occupied tide and submerged land.

It is the policy of the state to allow preference rights for the acquisition of tide and submerged land occupied or developed for municipal business, residential or other beneficial purposes on or before the date of admission of Alaska into the Union. Nothing in this section vests the right in a person to acquire the land until a conveyance from the state is delivered to the grantee.

Home rule cities and cities of the first class incorporated on or before April 1, 1964, may apply, in the manner prescribed by the director, and in accordance with such regulations as the director may adopt, for a conveyance to them of all land seaward of the home rule cities and cities of the first class which is between the mean high tide line in, or forming the boundary of, the home rule cities and cities of the first class, and a line to be shown on a plat made a part of the application which shall be the pierhead line established under the Act of September 7, 1957, or the harbor line established under the Act of March 3, 1899, or if no pierhead line or harbor line is established then a line subject to approval by the director, with the concurrence of the commissioner, which shall be seaward of all tide and submerged land occupied or suitable for occupation and development without unreasonable interference with navigation. The director shall convey that tide and submerged land to home rule cities and cities of the first class. Applications by preference right claimants filed with the director before June 30, 1964, shall continue to be processed to a final determination and conveyance, if any, by the director, if such preference right claimants are entitled to a conveyance from the director under the laws existing previous to July 22, 1964.

Each home rule city and city of the first class granted a conveyance shall prepare an official subdivision plat of the area conveyed showing all structures and improvements and the boundaries of each tract occupied or developed, together with the name of the owner or claimant. The subdivisional plat shall include within the boundaries of each tract occupied or developed such surrounding tide and submerged land as is reasonably necessary in the opinion of the governing body of the home rule cities and cities of the first class for the use and enjoyment of the structures and improvements by the owner or claimant, but shall not include tide or submerged land which if granted to the occupant would unjustly deprive an occupant of adjoining land from reasonable use and enjoyment of it.

An occupant of land included in the conveyance to home rule cities and cities of the first class, who occupied or developed the land on and before September 7, 1957, has a class I preference right to the land from the home rule cities and cities of the first class upon the execution of a waiver to the state and the home rule cities and cities of the first class of all rights the occupant may have acquired under Public Law 85-303 (71 Stat. 623).

An occupant of land included in the conveyance to home rule cities and cities of the first class, who has a class II preference right by reason of the conveyance to home rule cities and cities of the first class, and is unwilling to waive the right has a preference right to the land which it is mandatory for the home rule cities and cities of the first class to expeditiously honor upon application from the occupant after the Secretary of the Army has submitted to the Secretary of the Interior and the governor of the state maps showing the pierhead line established by the Corps of Engineers with respect to the tract so granted.

An occupant of land included in the conveyance to home rule cities and cities of the first class, who occupied or developed the land after September 7, 1957, and before January 3, 1959, and who continued to occupy it on January 3, 1959, has a class III preference right to the land from the home rule cities and cities of the first class.

In making a conveyance to an occupant, the home rule cities and cities of the first class shall include as a part of the tract conveyed and in addition to the occupied or developed land, such additional tide and submerged land as is reasonably necessary in the opinion of the governing body of the home rule cities and cities of the first class for the occupant’s use and enjoyment of the occupied or developed land, but the conveyance shall not include any area which would unjustly deprive an occupant of adjoining land from reasonable use and enjoyment of it or which, if developed, will interfere with navigation.

Each home rule city and city of the first class receiving conveyances shall by ordinance provide for reasonable regulations governing the filing and processing of applications, publication of notices, and the adjudication of disputes between claimants by the governing body of the home rule cities and cities of the first class. A party aggrieved by its determination may appeal to the superior court.

When no preference right has been granted to purchase or lease tideland, the home rule cities and cities of the first class may sell or lease the tideland conveyed to them, and may impose terms or conditions for the sale or lease. Such terms and conditions shall include such reservation of rights-of-way as are necessary to provide reasonable access to public waters.

An occupant of tide or submerged land which is not seaward of a municipal corporation, who occupied or developed it on and prior to September 7, 1957, has a class I preference right to the land from the state. However, if the land is seaward of a surveyed townsite, the occupant shall execute a waiver to the state of all rights which the occupant may have acquired under Public Law 85-303 (71 Stat. 623), before the preference right may be exercised.

A person who has a class II preference right in the disposition of land by the state not provided for under (b)(3) of this section, and who is unwilling to waive that right, has a preference right to the land which it is mandatory for the director to expeditiously honor upon application from the occupant after the Secretary of the Army has submitted to the Secretary of the Interior and the governor of the state maps showing the pierhead line established by the Corps of Engineers with respect to the tract so granted.

An occupant of tide or submerged land which is not seaward of a municipal corporation, who occupied or developed it after September 7, 1957, and before January 3, 1959, and who continued to occupy it on January 3, 1959, has a class III preference right to the land from the state.

The preference right granted an occupant in (c) of this section is lost unless the occupant of tide or submerged land not seaward of a home rule or first class city makes application to the director to exercise the preference right by July 1, 1967.

Each occupant shall furnish at the cost of the occupant a plat showing the exterior boundaries of the tide and submerged land covered by the application, in form and with proof of accuracy as set out in regulations of the director, and shall show the location and nature of all fill material, buildings, structures and improvements, which form the basis of the application and which are situated upon the tract applied for. The applicant may include within the boundaries of the tract applied for such surrounding tide and submerged land as is reasonably necessary in the opinion of the applicant for the use and enjoyment of the structures and improvements by the occupant, but may not include any tide or submerged land which if granted to the occupant would unjustly deprive an occupant of adjoining land from reasonable use and enjoyment of it.

In making a conveyance to an occupant, the director shall include as a part of the tract conveyed, and in addition to the occupied or developed land, such additional tide and submerged land as is reasonably necessary in the opinion of the director for the occupant’s use and enjoyment of the occupied or developed land, but the conveyance shall not include any area which would unjustly deprive an occupant of adjoining land from reasonable use and enjoyment of it or which, if developed, will interfere with navigation.

The director shall by regulation provide for reasonable procedures governing the filing and processing of applications, the publication of notices and the adjudication of disputes between claimants. A party aggrieved by an adjudication may appeal to the superior court.

The holder of a valid Corps of Engineers permit issued before November 15, 1959, may be given a preference to a lease or permit by the state if justified in accordance with the policy of this chapter and if in the best interests of the state. This preference is subordinate to all other preferences recognized under this chapter.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires,

“class I preference right” means the right of an occupant to acquire tide and submerged land for a consideration not exceeding the costs of surveying, transferring, and conveying the title to it;

“class II preference right” means the right to acquire tide or submerged land as defined in Public Law 85-303 (71 Stat. 623) for a consideration not exceeding the costs of surveying, transferring, and conveying the title to it;

“class III preference right” means the right of an occupant to acquire tide and submerged land for a consideration not exceeding the cost of appraisal, administration, and transfer plus the appraised fair market value, exclusive of value accruing from improvements or development, such as fill material, buildings, or structures, by the occupant or predecessor in interest of the occupant or reflecting, equities of the occupant;

“home rule cities and cities of the first class” do not include a borough;

“occupant” means a person or the successor in interest of a person, who actually occupied for business, residential, or other beneficial purpose, tideland, or tide and submerged land contiguous to tideland, in the state, on and before January 3, 1959, with substantial permanent improvements; the holder of a permit or clearance in respect to interference of navigation, or of a special use permit from a government agency does not qualify as an “occupant” unless entry on the land had, through exercise of reasonable diligence, resulted in occupancy and substantial permanent improvements; no person is an occupant by reason of having (A) placed a fish trap in position for operation or upon the tide or submerged land for storage, (B) placed a set net or piling for a set net, or any other device or facility for taking fish, (C) placed pilings or dolphins for log storage or other moorage, (D) placed floats or vessels upon the tide or submerged land, (E) placed telephone, power or other transmission facilities, roads, trails or other improvements not requiring exclusive use or possession of tide or submerged land, or (F) claimed the land by virtue of some form of constructive occupancy; where land is occupied by a person other than the owner of the improvements on it, the owner of the improvements is, for the purposes of this section, the occupant of the land;

“occupied or developed” means the use, occupancy, and control of tide or submerged land by the establishment on it of substantial permanent improvements other than those uses, facilities, and improvements not qualifying a person to be an occupant;

“person” means a person, firm, corporation, cooperative association, partnership, or other entity legally capable of owning land or an interest in land;

“preference right,” subject to the classification of preference right established in this section, means the right of an occupant to acquire, by lease, purchase, or otherwise, at the election of the occupant, except as otherwise limited or prescribed in this chapter, a tract of tideland, or tide and submerged land contiguous to tideland, occupied or developed by the occupant on and before January 3, 1959.

History.

(§ 5 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1962; am §§ 1, 2 ch 81 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.320

. Renumbered in 1984.
Subsection (d) was reorganized in 1984 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Cross references. —

For reservation to which contracts for sale, lease or grant of state land and deeds to state land, properties or interest to state land are subject, see AS

38.05.125

.

Administrative Code. —

For tide and submerged lands, see 11 AAC 62.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The occupants of tidelands lying offshore of cities have present vested property rights under the 1957 federal Tidelands Act, which the state must recognize in acquiring rights-of-way for state roads. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

Before the state uses tidelands lying offshore of cities, the tideland occupants must be paid for the full value of the property they occupy. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The division of land and water management may convey to a city tidelands and submerged lands located seaward of the city’s municipal boundaries, but this conveyance is subject to prior existing rights. The transfer should take the form of a quitclaim conveyance, which conveyance transfers only whatever right, title, and interest the grantor has in the property conveyed. November 26, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

The state may not make a conveyance of tidelands under this section to a unified home rule city, since a unified home rule city is a single political entity consisting of a borough and all cities within it, and paragraph (d)(4) provides that home rule cities and cities of the first class, the types of cities which may apply for such conveyances, do not include a borough.
April 15, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.; December 2, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.821.
Tideland seaward of public recreational sites.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a home rule or general law municipality that accepts by conveyance or other disposition from the state a public recreation area facility developed under the terms of P.L. 84-507, 70 Stat. 130, upon application, shall receive by conveyance from the director all land owned by the state seaward of the public recreation area facility that is between the mean high tide line and the mean low tide line. The director may adopt necessary regulations providing for the conveyance of land under this section.

Interests obtained by lease for shore fisheries development, sale, permit, or lease for mineral exploration, development, or extraction, or for any other purpose, before August 13, 1974, are affected by this section only on the date of their expiration or termination.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1974; am § 12 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.323

. Renumbered in 1984.

Sec. 38.05.825.
Conveyance of tide and submerged land to municipalities.

Unless the commissioner finds that the public interest in retaining state ownership of the land clearly outweighs the municipality’s interest in obtaining the land, the commissioner shall convey to a municipality tide or submerged land requested by the municipality that is occupied or suitable for occupation and development if the

land is within or contiguous to the boundaries of the municipality;

use of the land would not unreasonably interfere with navigation or public access;

municipality has applied to the commissioner for conveyance of the land under this section;

land is not subject to a shore fisheries lease under AS

38.05.082

, or, if the land is subject to a shore fisheries lease, the commissioner determines it is in the best interests of the state to convey the land;

land is classified for waterfront development or for another use that is consistent or compatible with the use proposed by the municipality, or the proposed use of the land is consistent or compatible with a land use plan adopted by the municipality or the department; and

land

is required for the accomplishment of a public or private development approved by the municipality;

is the subject of a lease from the state to the municipality; or

has been approved for lease to the municipality.

The commissioner may not convey land under this section that has been designated by statute unless the commissioner determines that the proposed use is consistent or compatible with the purpose of the statutory designation. Land designated as a state game refuge, game sanctuary, or critical habitat area may not be conveyed unless the commissioner of fish and game also determines that the proposed use is consistent or compatible with the purpose of the designation. If land designated by statute is conveyed, uses of the land after conveyance are restricted to those uses determined by the commissioner of natural resources to be consistent or compatible with the purpose of the designation.

Upon receipt of an application, the commissioner shall determine whether the requested conveyance meets the requirements of this section and issue a written decision regarding that determination. Upon a determination that the requirements have been met, the commissioner shall approve the conveyance of the land to the municipality. After conveyance to the municipality is approved, the municipality has management authority of the land and may lease the land, but may not sell it. The cost of the survey and all subdivision or other platting required for conveyance shall be borne by the municipality.

A conveyance under this section may contain only those restrictions required by law, including AS

38.05.127

and (b) of this section, or required to support a finding that the conveyance is in the best interest of the state. Land conveyed is subject to the public trust doctrine that may be enforced by the state in a court of competent jurisdiction. The municipality shall be required to ensure that reasonable access to public waters and tidelands is provided. The municipality may not lease land conveyed under this section for shore fisheries, but after conveyance, the land may be leased by the state for shore fisheries under AS

38.05.082

if the commissioner determines that the lease is compatible with the municipality’s use of the land. Title to land conveyed under this section that is retained by the municipality reverts to the state upon the dissolution of the municipality.

This section does not enlarge or diminish the general grant land entitlement of a municipality under AS 29.65, nor is a conveyance under this section counted against the municipality’s general grant land entitlement.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 2003)

Sec. 38.05.830.
Land disposal in the unorganized borough.

Before a sale, lease under AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

, or other disposal of state land in the unorganized borough, the commissioner shall consider the effect that the sale, lease, or other disposal may be expected to have on the density of the population in the vicinity of the land, and potential for conflicts with the traditional uses of the land that could result from the sale, lease, or disposal.
If necessary, the commissioner shall develop a plan to resolve or mitigate the conflicts in a manner consistent with the public interest and the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 33 ch 113 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.301

. Renumbered in 1984.

Sec. 38.05.840.
Appraisal.

Land may not be sold or leased, or a renewal lease issued, except in the case of an oil or gas or mineral lease, unless it has been appraised within two years before the date fixed for the sale or lease. When land is offered at public sale but is not sold and is available at private sale, a reappraisal is not required unless the director considers that a change in value of the land may have occurred. A grazing lease may be granted to a lessee of federal grazing land without prior appraisal if the federal lease was cancelled to allow the state to select the land under lease. Land may not be sold or leased for less than the approved, appraised market value, except as provided in AS

38.05.055

,

38.05.057

,

38.05.075

—

38.05.085

,

38.05.097

,

38.05.810

, and

38.05.820

.

Appraisals required by this section may be made by employees of the department who are qualified to determine the value of land under standards set by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 3 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 182 SLA 1978; am §§ 37, 38 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 41 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 25 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.310

. Renumbered in 1984.

Administrative Code. —

For land exchanges, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8.

Sec. 38.05.850.
Permits.

The director, without the prior approval of the commissioner, may issue permits, rights-of-way, or easements on state land for roads, trails, ditches, field gathering lines or transmission and distribution pipelines not subject to AS 38.35, telephone or electric transmission and distribution lines, log storage, oil well drilling sites and production facilities for the purposes of recovering minerals from adjacent land under valid lease, and other similar uses or improvements, or revocable, nonexclusive permits for the personal or commercial use or removal of resources that the director has determined to be of limited value. The commissioner, upon recommendation of the director, shall establish a reasonable rate or fee schedule to be charged for these uses, subject to the exception for nonprofit cooperative associations specified in (b) of this section. In the granting, suspension, or revocation of a permit or easement of land, the director shall give preference to that use of the land that will be of greatest economic benefit to the state and the development of its resources. However, first preference shall be granted to the upland owner for the use of a tract of tideland, or tideland and contiguous submerged land, that is seaward of the upland property of the upland owner and that is needed by the upland owner for any of the purposes for which the use may be granted.

The fee charged for a right-of-way approved under (a) of this section shall be waived by the commissioner if the right-of-way is for a transmission or distribution line established by a nonprofit cooperative association organized under AS 10.25 for the purpose of supplying electric energy and power, or telephone service, to its members, and the waiver is considered by the commissioner to be in the best interests of the state.

If the director determines, by evaluation of the nature and duration of the intended use, that an easement or right-of-way issued under this section will not be functionally revocable, the director shall provide public notice before issuing the easement or right-of-way.

History.

(§ 7 art III ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 13 ch 257 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 25 SLA 1979; am § 26 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 27 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.330

. Renumbered in 1984.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For additional provisions for seismic exploration and stratigraphic tests, see 11 AAC 96, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A special land use permit may be revoked or terminated given a permittee’s death and his earlier unauthorized attempt to transfer it.
December 15, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen.

Secs. 38.05.855,
38.05.856.
Identification of sites for aquatic farms and hatcheries; tideland and land use permits for aquatic farming. [Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]